South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S469.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Natural Resources, relating to Electronic Harvest Reporting of Big Game - SC Game Check, designated as Regulation Document Number 5331, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The Department of Natural Resources proposes to add Regulation 123-57 "Electronic Harvest Reporting of Big Game - SC Game Check". The subject of the proposed action is to amend the regulations to add provisions to prescribe details of electronic harvest reporting for all big game species (deer, wild turkey, and black bear). SC Code Section 50-11-546 was amended effective July 1, 2024, to make electronic harvest reporting applicable to all big game species. Regulations prescribe reporting methods and reporting elements required. The Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on September 27, 2024. ----XX----